Wisconsin, session 2025, AB640.
do enact as follows:AB640,13Section 1. 757.023 of the statutes is created to read:AB640,2,24757.023 Maximum age for justices and judges. (1) No person may be 5elected or appointed to serve as a supreme court justice or judge of a court of record 1if the date of election or appointment occurs on or after the date the person attains 2the age of 75 years.AB640,2,43(2) Subsection (1) does not apply to a temporary reserve judge appointed 4under s. 753.075.AB640,2,55